Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.274

Limousine.

"Limousine" means a category of for hire, chauffeur-driven, unmetered, unmarked luxury motor vehicles. The director in consultation with the Washington state patrol will by rule define the categories of limousines.

[ 2006 c 98 s 1; 1996 c 87 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 98: "This act takes effect November 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 98 s 2.]